Utah statutes.
11-32-10.   Application to other laws and proceedings.

(1)  This chapter is supplemental to all existing laws relating to the collection of delinquent taxes by participant members.

(2) (a)  No ordinance, resolution, or proceeding in respect to any transaction authorized by this chapter is necessary except as specifically required in this chapter nor is the publication of any resolution, proceeding, or notice relating to any transaction authorized by this chapter necessary except as required by this chapter. 

(b)  A publication made under this chapter may be made:

(i)  in a newspaper conforming to the terms of this chapter and in which legal notices may be published under the laws of Utah, without regard to the designation of it as the official journal or newspaper of the public body; and

(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(c)  No resolution adopted or proceeding taken under this chapter may be subject to referendum petition or to an election other than as permitted in this chapter.

(d)  All proceedings adopted under this chapter may be adopted on a single reading at any legally convened meeting of the governing body or bodies or the board of trustees of the authority as appropriate.

(3)  Any formal action or proceeding taken by the governing body of a county or other public body or the board of trustees of an authority under the authority of this chapter may be taken by resolution of the governing body or the board of trustees as appropriate.

(4)  This chapter shall apply to all authorities created, assignment agreements executed, and bonds issued after this chapter takes effect.

(5)  All proceedings taken before the effective date of this chapter by a county or other public body in connection with the creation and operation of a financing authority are validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed.

